Washington statutes.
RCW 36.93.180

Objectives of boundary review board.

The decisions of the boundary review board shall attempt to achieve the following objectives:

(1) Preservation of natural neighborhoods and communities;

(2) Use of physical boundaries, including but not limited to bodies of water, highways, and land contours;

(3) Creation and preservation of logical service areas;

(4) Prevention of abnormally irregular boundaries;

(5) Discouragement of multiple incorporations of small cities and encouragement of incorporation of cities in excess of ten thousand population in heavily populated urban areas;

(6) Dissolution of inactive special purpose districts;

(7) Adjustment of impractical boundaries;

(8) Incorporation as cities or towns or annexation to cities or towns of unincorporated areas which are urban in character; and

(9) Protection of agricultural and rural lands which are designated for long term productive agricultural and resource use by a comprehensive plan adopted by the county legislative authority.

[ 1989 c 84 s 6; 1981 c 332 s 10; 1979 ex.s. c 142 s 2; 1967 c 189 s 18.]